District of Columbia statutes.
15-107

Setting off judgments.

Where reciprocal claims between different parties have passed into judgments the court, on motion, may order that the judgments be set off against each other and satisfaction of both be entered to the amount of the smaller claim.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 524, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 15-107.
1973 Ed., § 15-107.